Idaho, session 2026, S1306.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 43-1104, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
43-1104. HEARING ON PETITION -- ORDER OF EXCLUSION. (1) The board of
directors of the irrigation district may conduct its own investigation of
the facts alleged in the petition and, by resolution duly adopted, which may
address the allegations of several petitions, accept the facts as alleged
and determine that no hearing is required prior to granting the petition or
petitions for exclusion. If the allegations are not thus accepted such pe-
tition must be heard by the board of directors of such irrigation district
within one hundred fifty (150) days of filing of the petition. If no hearing
is held within one hundred fifty (150) days, the land described in the peti-
tion is excluded from the district. If a hearing is ordered, the petitioner
or petitioners must establish by competent evidence the allegations of the
petition, and the chairman or presiding member of the board is hereby empow-
ered to administer oaths for the purpose of the hearing. a petition. Within
one hundred fifty (150) days of receiving a petition, the board shall adopt a
resolution that addresses one (1) or more petitions and:
(a) Accepts the alleged facts and grants the petition or petitions as
requested; or
(b) Rejects or otherwise disputes the alleged facts and denies the pe-
tition or petitions as requested. In such cases, the resolution shall
be accompanied by the board's reasoned explanation for such decision,
and the resolution and explanation shall be physically mailed to the pe-
titioner.
(2)(a) If a petitioner disagrees with the board's decision, the peti-
tioner may request a hearing before the board to review the decision.
Such request must be made in writing by the petitioner within forty-five
(45) days of the date the board's decision was mailed to the petitioner.
The board's adopted resolution shall become a final decision after the
forty-five (45) day period has ended.
(b) If a hearing is requested, the board shall:
(i) Set a date for the hearing that is no later than sixty (60)
days from the date the board received the petitioner's written re-
quest; and
(ii) Notify the petitioner of the date and time of the hearing.


(c) At the hearing, the petitioner or petitioners shall establish by
competent evidence the allegations of the petition, and the chair or
presiding member of the board is hereby empowered to administer oaths
for the purpose of the hearing.
(d) A hearing shall not be held if the board issues an order excluding
the land described in the petition from the district prior to the date of
the hearing.
(3) When (1) the board of directors accepts the facts as alleged with-
out a hearing, or (2) when the allegations of the petition are established at
a hearing, or (3) the land has been excluded by reason of the board's fail-
ure to hold a hearing within one hundred fifty (150) days of filing of the
petition, the board must the board shall make an order forthwith changing
the boundaries of such district so as to exclude the lands described in the
petition which that the proof has established to be entitled to exclusion,
and thereafter the lands so excluded shall not form a part of the irriga-
tion district for any purpose except as provided in subsection (b) of section
43-1102, Idaho Code; provided however, that the lands so ordered excluded
shall not be relieved of their obligation to pay their proportionate share of
any existing bonded or contract indebtedness of the irrigation district, and
the lands shall remain a part of the irrigation district for the purpose of
discharging the existing bonded or contract indebtedness.
No hearing shall be held when, prior to the date set for the hearing, the
board issues an order excluding the land described in the petition from the
district.
(4) When land is excluded from the district pursuant to a petition filed
on or before December 1 in any calendar year, assessments against the land
for any calendar year subsequent to the year in which the petition was filed
shall not be valid and no lien for any such attempted assessment shall attach
under section 43-706, Idaho Code. Petitioners are, however, required to pay
any outstanding assessments levied the calendar year and prior in which the
petition is filed and said lien shall attach until said assessments are paid.
SECTION 2. That Section 43-1107, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
43-1107. COSTS. The costs of excluding any land as provided in this
chapter shall be borne by the petitioner or petitioners except in cases
where:
(1) The lands excluded are found to be too high or not susceptible of
irrigation from the water system of the district without pumping by the
landowner and the petitioner or previous owners of the land have paid the
assessments of the district against that land; or
(2) The exclusion is requested under pursuant to subsection (a)3. or
(a)4. of section 43-1102, Idaho Code, and for the five (5) irrigation sea-
sons preceding the filing of the petition: (a) there has been no pipe, ditch,
or other delivery system between the land and the assigned delivery point
on the district's irrigation system, and (b) the petitioner or previous
owners of the land have paid the assessments of the district against that
land. If the petitioner is required to pay the costs of exclusion hearing
proceedings, the board may require a deposit of the estimated costs before
they the board will hear the petition and the one hundred fifty (150) sixty


(60) day period in which the petition must be heard as provided in section
43-1104, Idaho Code, shall not begin to run until the estimated costs have
been deposited; provided however, that, in case of a successful appeal by
the petitioner, the costs taxed by the district to the petitioner or peti-
tioners whose lands are excluded by the district court shall be borne by the
irrigation district. If the actual costs of the exclusion proceedings are
less than the amount deposited by the petitioner, the excess deposit shall
be credited against any amounts which that are to be paid by the petitioner
prior to entry of the order of exclusion, and the balance, if any, shall be
refunded to the petitioner within fourteen (14) days after the hearing; if
the actual costs of the exclusion proceedings are more than the deposit, the
difference shall be paid to the district by the petitioner within fourteen
(14) days after receipt of a statement to that effect from the district, and
the board shall not be required to enter an order of exclusion until the dif-
ference is paid.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.